Massachusetts, session 194th, H1438.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 35 of Chapter 12 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
in subsection (b):-
The student loan ombudsman in coordination with the human services division within the
executive office for administration and finance shall assist in establishing a live annual training
program for all state employees regarding their eligibility for the Public Service Loan
Forgiveness Program through the U.S. Department of Education. An online training module shall
be provided during all new state employee onboarding.
of 1